Tennessee statutes. Title 58 Military Affairs, Emergencies and Civil Defense
Part 1

Military Forces — In General

58-1-101. Short title.

Parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter may be cited as the “Tennessee Military Code of 1970.”

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 1; T.C.A., § 7-101.

Cross-References. Excused absence for deployment or return from deployment of parent or guardian in armed forces, § 49-6-3019.

Militia, title 58, ch. 1, part 3.

Priority on wait list of children with parent or guardian serving on active duty in armed forces, § 71-3-518.

Law Reviews.

Suddenly Discharged the Combat Continues: Eliminating the Legal Services Gap to Ensure Veterans' Success After Leaving Military Service, 45 U. Mem. L. Rev. 837 (2015).

The Credibility Trap: Notes on a VA Evidentiary Standard, 45 U. Mem. L. Rev. 887 (2015).

58-1-102. Definitions.

In parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Active duty” and “active service” means military duty in a military force (not including the inactive national guard) or in the military department, under an order of the governor issued pursuant to parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter and while going to and returning from the same. Such duty may be either in a full-time or part-time status, depending upon the conditions under which it is performed;

“Active military service of the United States” means full-time duty in the army, navy (including marine corps), air force or coast guard of the United States;

“Air national guard” means that part of the national guard which is:

An air force;

Trained, and has its officers appointed under the United States Constitution, article 1, § 8, clause 16, and federal laws enacted pursuant thereto, and under the Constitution of Tennessee and parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter;

Organized, armed and equipped wholly or partly at federal expense; and

Federally recognized;

“Army national guard” means that part of the national guard which is:

A land force;

Trained, and has its officers appointed under United States Constitution, article 1, § 8, clause 16, and federal laws enacted pursuant thereto, and under the Constitution of Tennessee and parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter;

Organized, armed and equipped wholly or partly at federal expense; and

Federally recognized;

“Commanding officer” includes only commissioned officers;

“Enlisted member” means a person in an enlisted grade or status;

“Federal recognition” means acknowledgment by the federal government that a person appointed to an authorized grade and position vacancy in the national guard meets the prescribed federal standards for such grade and position;

“Grade” means a step or degree, in a graduated scale of office, or military rank, that is established and designated as a grade by law or regulations;

“May” is used in a permissive sense. “No person may” means that no person is required, authorized or permitted to do the act described;

“Military” is used as a descriptive adjective to denote a quality pertaining to any or all of the armed forces;

“Military department” means the military agency or division of the state, the composition of which is set forth in § 58-1-114;

“Military service of the state” means service in or with any of the military forces or the military department;

“National guard” means the army national guard and the air national guard;

“Officer” or “commissioned officer” means commissioned or warrant officer;

“Rank” means the order of precedence among members of the armed forces;

“Shall” is used in an imperative and mandatory sense;

“Superior officer” means a commissioned officer superior in rank or command; and

“Voluntary aid or assistance” means actions taken by individual units of the national guard, within guidelines provided by the governor, to provide local communities with assistance during times of crisis not otherwise declared by the governor or president of the United States as a disaster or emergency.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 2; 1978, ch. 830, § 1; T.C.A., § 7-102.

Cross-References. Priority on wait list of children with parent or guardian serving on active duty in armed forces, § 71-3-518.

58-1-103. Custom and usage of the armed forces of the United States — Regulations continued in effect.

All matters relating to the organization, discipline and government of the Tennessee national guard, not otherwise provided for in parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter, or by regulations issued pursuant thereto, shall be decided by the customs and usage of the appropriate force or forces of the armed forces of the United States.

All regulations in effect on March 2, 1970, and consistent with parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter, shall hereby continue in effect until such time as the same may be modified, rescinded, superseded, or otherwise changed by regulations issued pursuant to such sections.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, §§ 100, 101; T.C.A., § 7-103.

Cross-References. Priority on wait list of children with parent or guardian serving on active duty in armed forces, § 71-3-518.

58-1-104. Military forces — Division and composition.

The military forces of the state, in conformity with the Constitution of Tennessee, shall be divided into three (3) parts, as follows: the army, the navy and the militia.

The army shall be composed of an army national guard and an air national guard, which forces, together with an inactive national guard, when such is authorized by the laws of the United States and regulations issued pursuant thereto, shall comprise the Tennessee national guard; and the Tennessee state guard, whenever such a state force shall be duly organized, and its reserve.

The navy shall consist of such naval or sea forces as may be duly organized.

The militia shall consist of all able-bodied male citizens who are residents of this state and between eighteen (18) and forty-five (45) years of age and who are not members of the army or navy as hereinabove defined, and who may not otherwise be exempted by the laws of this state or the United States.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 3; T.C.A., § 7-104; Acts 1985, ch. 36, §§ 13, 14; 1998, ch. 584, § 1.

Cross-References. Air national guard, § 58-1-204.

Army national guard, § 58-1-203.

Defense force, title 58, ch. 1, part 4.

Militia, Tenn. Const., art. I, §§ 24, 25; art. VIII.

National guard, §§ 58-1-105 — 58-1-235.

Performance of military duty, Tenn. Const., art. I, § 28; art. IV, § 1.

Priority on wait list of children with parent or guardian serving on active duty in armed forces, § 71-3-518.

Transfer of militia to national guard after call to active service, § 58-1-305.

Attorney General Opinions. When activated by the governor to active state duty and operating in the course of that duty, the Tennessee state guard constitutes an arm of the state and enjoys the sovereign immunity of the state of Tennessee; thus, if monthly drills and training opportunities are in the course of active duty, the state guard, under the order, control and supervision of the governor, is immune from suit, OAG 02-011 (1/10/02).

58-1-105. Commander-in-chief of military forces — Powers — Regulations.

The governor shall be the commander-in-chief of the military forces, except when they shall have been called into the service of the United States, and is authorized and empowered:

To issue all such orders, rules and regulations as may be necessary to provide for the organization, government, discipline, maintenance, training, and equipment of the national guard. All such orders, rules and regulations issued by the governor shall have the force and effect of law, but they shall conform to the laws and regulations of the United States relating to the organization, discipline and training of the national guard, to parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter and as nearly as practicable to the laws and regulations governing the United States army and the United States air force;

Upon the duly and legally constituted call of the president of the United States, to call into service all or any portion of the military forces of the state;

To appoint, commission and determine the grade of all officers and to select all warrant officers;

To determine and fix the home station and location of the various units of the national guard;

To provide such buildings, facilities and grounds as may be necessary to conduct the various activities of the branches and units of the national guard;

To have, exercise and enjoy such other, further and general powers with respect to the military forces, as may be necessary to execute parts 1, 2 and 4-6 of this chapter or any other statute, or any constitutional provision affecting the military forces, as such statutes and constitution may now exist, or with any amendments thereto or changes therein; and

To issue rules, regulations and guidelines specifying the manner, conditions and time period in which a military unit may engage in voluntary aid or assistance.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 4; 1978, ch. 830, § 2; T.C.A., § 7-105.

Cross-References. Appointment and promotion of national guard officers, §§ 58-1-209 — 58-1-213.

Appointment of state guard officers, § 58-1-405.

Devolution of duties on adjutant general, § 58-1-116.

Extension of periods of service, § 58-1-221.

Governor to be commander-in-chief, Tenn. Const., art. III, § 5.

Militia line officers, election by ballot, § 58-1-303.

Powers over militia, title 58, ch. 1, part 3.

Priority on wait list of children with parent or guardian serving on active duty in armed forces, § 71-3-518.

Supervision of state guard, § 58-1-405.

Transfer of militia to national guard, § 58-1-305.

58-1-106. Active state duty — Compensation — Reimbursement by city or county.

The governor shall have the power, in case of invasion, disaster, insurrection, riot, attack, or combination to oppose the enforcement of the law by force and violence, or imminent danger thereof, or other grave emergency, to order into the active service of the state, for such period, to such extent and in such manner as the governor may deem necessary, all or any part of the national guard or the Tennessee state guard, but, in accordance with the constitution, may not call the militia into service except in case of rebellion or invasion, and then only when the general assembly shall declare by law that the public safety requires it.

Whenever members of the military forces are called into active service of the state, they shall serve for such period as the governor may direct, not to exceed the duration of the emergency for which they may be called. The compensation of all members while on duty or assembled pursuant to subsection (a) shall be paid in the manner and in the amounts prescribed by § 58-1-109 for the national guard and § 58-1-411 for the Tennessee state guard.

As an alternative and cumulative procedure, upon the request of the governing body of a city or county, and its representation, by resolution duly and regularly adopted, that there is a breakdown of law and order, a grievous breach of the peace, a riot, resistance to process of this state, or disaster, or imminent danger thereof, the governor may order into the active service of the state, for such period, to such extent and in such manner as the governor may deem necessary, all, or any part of, the national guard, or the Tennessee state guard. When the national guard or state guard is called pursuant to resolutions so adopted, the compensation of all members while on duty, shall be paid in the manner and in the amounts set forth in § 58-1-109 for the national guard and § 58-1-411 for the Tennessee state guard, and the county and/or city shall reimburse the military department for all such compensation and for all expenses incurred in connection with such duty. Compensation and expenses shall be paid forthwith upon demand of the adjutant general and upon default of payment, all state funds payable to such defaulting city or county shall be withheld until such time as the full amount has been collected and applied to the satisfaction of the indebtedness. Assistance authorized by, and requested from, competent authority provided only by the Tennessee state guard at the request of a city, county, or other local authority pursuant to this section by volunteers without compensation, shall not require the county or city to reimburse the military department; provided, however, that any travel expenses resulting from the authorized assistance of Tennessee state guard members from outside the requesting city or county shall require reimbursement from the city, county or local authority to the military department, when the department incurs an expense as a result of the travel for costs directly paid by the department or for travel claims filed by Tennessee state guard members.

Duty performed pursuant to this section shall not count against the leaves provided for in § 8-33-109 and title 8, chapter 50, part 8, nor against any other leave provided by law, regulation, policy or practice of the state or any county, municipality, or other arm, agency or political subdivision of the state. Compensation as provided in § 58-1-109, for such duty shall be in addition to the salary or compensation otherwise payable to any member who is an officer or employee of the state or any political subdivision thereof.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 5; T.C.A., § 7-106; Acts 1985, ch. 36, § 15; 1998, ch. 584, §§ 2-4; 2013, ch. 364, §§ 2-4.

Cross-References. Calling militia into active service, Tenn. Const., art. III, § 5; § 58-1-301.

Compensation of state guard, § 58-1-411.

Enlisting state guard, see § 58-1-401.

Failure to appear for service when called, § 58-1-302.

Group life insurance plan for guardsmen on active duty, § 8-27-206.

Offenses specifically applicable to the national guard while in a drill or duty status, penalties, § 58-1-632.

Priority on wait list of children with parent or guardian serving on active duty in armed forces, § 71-3-518.

Public employees in military service, title 8, ch. 33.

Standing armies avoided in time of peace, Tenn. Const., art. I, § 24.

Attorney General Opinions. When activated by the governor to active state duty and operating in the course of that duty, the Tennessee state guard constitutes an arm of the state and enjoys the sovereign immunity of the state of Tennessee; thus, if monthly drills and training opportunities are in the course of active duty, the state guard, under the order, control and supervision of the governor, is immune from suit, OAG 02-011 (1/10/02).

When in a non-paid status, state guard members enjoy neither immunity from suit, nor workers’ compensation benefits, OAG 05-112 (7/18/05).

The governor may delegate his authority to activate, supervise and control the state guard to the adjutant general, OAG 05-112 (7/18/05).

Activation of members of the Tennessee National Guard for emergency purposes, OAG 07-03, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 3 (1/8/07).

58-1-107. Troops on active duty — Commanding officers — Powers and duties.

When troops of the national guard are assigned to any state duty contemplated hereby, they shall act under the orders of the governor as commander in chief. Commanding officers of troops so employed are responsible only to their military superiors, and shall not act under, nor be subject to, the orders of any civil officer; they shall apply military tactics in respect to the manner in which they shall act to accomplish their missions, and shall use the minimum amount of force necessary to ensure the accomplishment thereof.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 6; T.C.A., § 7-107.

Cross-References. Priority on wait list of children with parent or guardian serving on active duty in armed forces, § 71-3-518.

58-1-108. Active state duty — Individuals.

The governor is authorized and empowered to call individual members of the national guard to active state duty with their consent, for the performance of any official duty in connection with national guard activities.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 7; T.C.A., § 7-108.

Cross-References. Priority on wait list of children with parent or guardian serving on active duty in armed forces, § 71-3-518.

58-1-109. Active duty pay.

Members of the national guard when assigned to state military duty by the commander in chief, or when ordered to active state service pursuant to § 58-1-106, shall be paid from the funds appropriated, or otherwise legally made available to the military department, at the same rate of pay and allowances as are at the time provided for the same grade and ratings in active federal service, except that lesser rates of pay may be prescribed by the adjutant general for personnel on full-time active duty; provided, however, that no member shall receive less than fifty dollars ($50.00) per day. No member shall receive less than fifty-five dollars ($55.00) per day when called to active duty in case of grave emergency under § 58-1-106.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 8; 1971, ch. 184, § 1; T.C.A., § 7-109; Acts 1987, ch. 128, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by § 9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

Cross-References. Priority on wait list of children with parent or guardian serving on active duty in armed forces, § 71-3-518.

58-1-110. Military staff of the governor.

The military staff of the governor shall consist of the adjutant general, who shall be ex officio chief of staff, the national guard officers assigned to the state headquarters, and such aides-de-camp as the governor shall deem necessary, all of whom shall be federally recognized, commissioned officers detailed by the governor from the national guard. Officers detailed pursuant to this section shall not be relieved from their ordinary duties except when actually on duty with the governor. The military staff of the governor shall perform such personal and ceremonial duties as may be required by the governor.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 9; T.C.A., § 7-110.

Cross-References. Governor to appoint his military staff, Tenn. Const., art. VIII, § 2.

Priority on wait list of children with parent or guardian serving on active duty in armed forces, § 71-3-518.

58-1-111. Honorary staff of the governor.

The honorary staff of the governor shall consist of the adjutant general, who shall be ex officio chief of staff, and such honorary aides-de-camp as the governor may deem desirable or proper. Honorary staff officers shall bear the honorary rank and title of colonel.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 10; T.C.A., § 7-111.

Cross-References. Priority on wait list of children with parent or guardian serving on active duty in armed forces, § 71-3-518.

58-1-112. Martial rule — Proclamation by governor — Procedure.

Whenever any portion of the national guard is employed pursuant to § 58-1-106, the governor, if in the governor's judgment the maintenance of law and order will thereby be promoted, may, by proclamation, declare the county or city in which troops are serving, or any specified portion thereof, to be under martial rule.

Following the governor's martial rule proclamation, the governor may promulgate the following orders to protect life and property or to bring the emergency situation under control:

The establishment of a curfew and the prohibition and control of pedestrian and vehicular traffic, except essential emergency vehicles and personnel;

The designation of specific zones within which the occupance and use of buildings and the ingress and egress of vehicles and persons may be prohibited or regulated;

The regulation and closing of places of amusement and assembly;

The prohibition of the sale and distribution of alcoholic beverages;

The prohibition and control of the presence of persons on public streets;

The regulation and control of the possession, storage, display, sale, transport and use of firearms, other dangerous weapons and ammunition; provided, that nothing in this subdivision (b)(6) shall be construed as authorizing confiscation of lawfully possessed firearms and ammunition during any period of martial rule; and

The regulation and control of the possession, storage, display, sale, transport and use of explosives, and flammable materials and liquids.

Such orders shall be effective from the time and in the manner prescribed in such orders and shall be given to the press, radio and television media for publication and broadcast.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a declaration of martial law, in the sense of the unrestricted power of military officers, or others, to dispose of the persons, liberties or property of the citizen.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 11; T.C.A., § 7-112; Acts 2009, ch. 288, § 1.

Cross-References. Priority on wait list of children with parent or guardian serving on active duty in armed forces, § 71-3-518.

Prohibition against exercise of martial law, Tenn. Const., art. I, § 25.

58-1-113. Service without the state — Offenses committed — Jurisdiction.

The governor may order the national guard, or any part thereof, to serve outside the borders of this state or of the United States in order to perform military duty of every description and to participate in parades, reviews, cruises, conferences, encampments, maneuvers or other training and to participate in small arms and other military competitions and to attend service schools.

Officers and enlisted men of the national guard shall be subject to and governed by this chapter while without this state under the order or authorization of the governor under subsection (a) in like manner and to the same extent as when on duty within this state under orders of the governor so as to allow the governor and the courts of this state to have jurisdiction over such guardsmen for offenses committed while physically outside the state, so long as the state where the offense was committed and the accused agree to the trial of the issue in the Tennessee courts.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 12; 1975, ch. 45, § 1; T.C.A., § 7-113.

Cross-References. Priority on wait list of children with parent or guardian serving on active duty in armed forces, § 71-3-518.

Attorney General Opinions. Activation of members of the Tennessee National Guard for emergency purposes, OAG 07-03, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 3 (1/8/07).

58-1-114. Military department constituted.

That agency, division or department of the state government, comprising the headquarters of the military forces of the state as constituted and defined in § 58-1-104, and the emergency management agency, shall be known and is hereby designated as the military department. The adjutant general shall be the executive head of the military department and commanding general of the military forces of the state.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 13; T.C.A., § 7-114.

Cross-References. Priority on wait list of children with parent or guardian serving on active duty in armed forces, § 71-3-518.

State system of personnel administration, title 8, ch. 30.

58-1-115. Adjutant general — Appointment.

The adjutant general shall be appointed by the governor for a term concurrent with the term of the governor who appointed the adjutant general, and shall serve as such at the pleasure of the governor. The adjutant general shall have such rank as may be conferred by the governor, but in no event shall such rank be higher than that of lieutenant general. The adjutant general shall be a member of the Tennessee national guard who meets all of the qualifications to be a federally recognized general officer.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 14; T.C.A., § 7-115; Acts 2007, ch. 140, § 1.

Cross-References. Governor empowered to appoint adjutant general, Tenn. Const., art. VIII, § 2.

Priority on wait list of children with parent or guardian serving on active duty in armed forces, § 71-3-518.

Salaries of Class 1 and Class 2 officers, § 8-23-101.

58-1-116. Duties of the adjutant general — Records of office as evidence.

The adjutant general shall be chief of staff to the governor and subordinate only to the governor in matters pertaining to the military department and the military and naval affairs of the state.

It shall be the duty of the adjutant general to direct the planning and employment of the military forces of the state in carrying out their state military mission; to establish unified command of state forces whenever they shall be jointly engaged; to coordinate the military and naval affairs with the civil defense of the state. The adjutant general shall be custodian of all military records and shall keep the same indexed and available for ready reference. The adjutant general shall keep an itemized account of all moneys received and disbursed from all sources and shall make a biennial report to the governor on the condition of the military department and the military forces of the state, together with such other matters relating to the military department, as the adjutant general shall deem expedient, or as may be directed by the governor. The adjutant general shall cause the laws and regulations relating to the military department to be distributed to all military forces of the state. The adjutant general shall further perform such duties pertaining to the adjutant general's office as from time to time may be provided by the laws, rules and regulations of the United States and such as may be designated by the governor.

The adjutant general shall have a seal of office approved by the governor and all copies and papers in the military department, duly certified and authenticated under such seal shall be evidence in like manner as if the original were produced.

Whenever the governor and those in succession to the governor under the constitution and laws of the state shall be unable to perform the duties of commander in chief, such duties shall devolve upon the adjutant general.

Acts 1970, ch. 596, § 15; T.C.A., § 7-116.

Cross-References. Administration of real and personal military property, §§ 58-1-506 — 58-1-515.

Annual report, § 4-4-114.

Priority on wait list of children with parent or guardian serving on active duty in armed forces, § 71-3-518.

Attorney General Opinions. The governor may delegate his authority to activate, supervise and control the state guard to the adjutant general, OAG 05-112 (7/18/05).

58-1-117. Design of the flag or banner of the military department.

The flag or banner of the Tennessee military department shall be of the following design, colors and proportions: an oblong flag or banner, the principal field of the flag or banner to be of the color blue, but the flag or banner ending at its free or outer end in a perpendicular bar of crimson, of uniform width, running from side to side, that is to say, from top to bottom of the flag or banner, and separated from the blue field by a narrow margin or stripe of white of uniform width; the width of the white stripe to be one third (1/3) that of the crimson bar; and the total width of the bar and stripe together to be equal to one sixteenth (1/16) of the width of the flag. In the center of the blue field shall be a distinctive crest. The crest shall be composed of a gold circle. Within the gold circle shall be a blue field with “Tennessee Military Department” in white along the top arch. The year “1796” in white shall be along the bottom arch of the circle. Three (3) white stars, representing the three (3) grand divisions of the state, shall be spaced equally on the sides of the language “1796”. A gold circle lies within the outer ring. The interior of the gold circle shall be white. Centered within the white field shall be a representation of the state of Tennessee, designed in the manner of the Tennessee state flag. A black and white line drawing of the Minuteman, the symbol of the National Guard, shall be centered within the white circle, in the foreground, and shall overlap the inner gold circle at the top and bottom. The distinctive crest shall be proportional to the appropriate size of the flag.

Acts 2008, ch. 645, § 1.

Cross-Reference. Grand divisions, title 4, ch. 1, part 2.

Priority on wait list of children with parent or guardian serving on active duty in armed forces, § 71-3-518.

58-1-118. Offenses involving improper use or display of military decorations, medals or badges.

It is an offense for a person to wear or display any decoration or medal authorized by congress for the armed forces of the United States, or any of the service medals or badges awarded to the members of those forces, or the ribbon, button or rosette of any such badge, decoration or medal, or any colorable imitation thereof, with the intent to deceive or misrepresent to another that the person is authorized under regulations made pursuant to law to wear or display the badge, decoration or medal.

It is an offense for a person to falsely represent, whether verbally or in writing, that the person has been awarded any decoration or medal authorized by congress for the armed forces of the United States, any of the service medals or badges awarded to the members of those forces, the ribbon, button or rosette of any such badge, decoration or medal, or any colorable imitation of such item.

It is an offense for a person to wear or display any decoration or medal authorized by the Tennessee military department, or the ribbon, button or rosette of any such decoration or medal, or any colorable imitation thereof, with the intent to deceive or misrepresent to another that the person is authorized under regulations made pursuant to law to wear or display any such decoration or medal.

It is an offense for a person to falsely represent, whether verbally or in writing, that the person has been awarded any decoration or medal authorized by the Tennessee military department, or the ribbon, button or rosette of any such decoration or medal, or any colorable imitation thereof.

A violation of subsection (a) or (b) is a Class B misdemeanor, except if a decoration or medal involved is a Congressional Medal of Honor, Distinguished Service Cross, Navy Cross, Air Force Cross, Silver Star, Purple Heart or any replacement or duplicate medal for such medal as authorized by law, then a violation of subsection (a) or (b) is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 2009, ch. 274, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalties for Class A and B misdemeanors, § 40-35-111.

Priority on wait list of children with parent or guardian serving on active duty in armed forces, § 71-3-518.

58-1-119. Offense of impersonating a member of the United States armed forces.

It is an offense for a person to falsely impersonate or represent to another, whether by conduct, dress, verbally or in writing, that such person or a third party is or was a member of the armed forces of the United States with the intent to deceive or cause another to believe the representation when the person knows it to be false.

It is not a defense to prosecution under this section that the person making the false representation received no benefit or monetary thing or value from it.

This section shall not apply to wearing the dress of a member of the armed forces if done for the following purposes:

Instructional;

Law enforcement;

Theatrical, motion picture or entertainment;

Historical, ceremonial or educational; or

As a costume if worn in accordance with or not prohibited by regulations promulgated pursuant to law.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit prosecution under any other applicable statute if the person derives a benefit or thing of value from the impersonation.

Impersonation of a member of the armed forces is a Class B misdemeanor.

Acts 2012, ch. 612, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for a Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Priority on wait list of children with parent or guardian serving on active duty in armed forces, § 71-3-518.